Utah statutes.
41-6a-1704.   Vehicle door -- Prohibited opening.
(1)  A person may not open the door of a motor vehicle on a side available to
moving traffic unless it can be done safely and without interfering with the
movement of other traffic.
(2)  A person may not leave a door open on a side of a vehicle available to
moving traffic for a period of time longer than necessary to load or unload
passengers.
